Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-125] Assaulting or wilfully
disobeying superior commissioned officer. Any person subject to this
chapter who:

(1) Strikes the person's superior commissioned
officer or draws or lifts up any weapon or offers any violence against the
superior commissioned officer while the officer is in the execution of this
office; or

(2) Wilfully disobeys a lawful command of the
person's superior commissioned officer;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L
1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next